Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2722
Record; certification required; effect.

Every record made in any county court, excepting original orders, judgments and decrees thereof, shall have attached thereto a certificate signed by the judge of such court, showing the date of such record and the county in which the same is made, and it shall not be necessary to call such judge or his successor in office to prove such record so certified.

G.S.1873, c. 14, § 34, p. 270;

R.S.1913, § 1234;

C.S.1922, § 1157;

C.S.1929, § 27-536;

R.S.1943, § 24-540;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 67;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-567.